Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.010

Qualifications—Oath—Bond.

No person shall be eligible to be attorney general unless he or she is a qualified practitioner of the supreme court of this state.

Before entering upon the duties of his or her office, any person elected or appointed attorney general shall take, subscribe, and file the oath of office as required by law; take, subscribe, and file with the secretary of state an oath to comply with the provisions of RCW 43.10.115; and execute and file with the secretary of state, a bond to the state, in the sum of five thousand dollars, with sureties to be approved by the governor, conditioned for the faithful performance of his or her duties and the paying over of all moneys, as provided by law.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5046; 1973 c 43 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.10.010. Prior: 1929 c 92 s 1, part; RRS s 11030, part; prior: 1921 c 119 s 1; 1888 p 7 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 c 43: "If any provision of this 1973 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1973 c 43 s 6.]